Mississippi, session 2026, HB893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings herein ascribe, unless context of use clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Disability" means, for a student in kindergarten through Grade 12, an autism spectrum disorder, as defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, published by the American Psychiatric Association or an intellectual disability. (b) "Elopement" means when a student with autism or another disability, who has a documented history of elopement or an identified safety risk related to elopement, leaves a safe or designated area, the supervision of school staff or school grounds without authorization or awareness of potential risk. The term may include wandering, walking away, running away or otherwise departing an assigned location unsupervised or unnoticed.  This term only applies when the behavior is connected to the student's disability-related needs and poses a safety concern.  The term does not include intentional class skipping or other nondisability-related absences. (2)  To ensure the safety of students with disabilities at risk of elopement, each public school shall create a School Staff Assistance for Emergencies (SAFE) Team and a school elopement plan.  The plan must include: (a)  Procedures for immediately contacting the student's parent or guardian if a student with disabilities elopes; and (b)  Procedures for conducting an immediate, coordinated on-campus search and contacting emergency services only when the student is reasonably believed, based on verified information or direct observation, to have left school grounds and to be at risk of harm. (3)  The school principal and an assistant principal shall serve on the SAFE Team and the school principal shall appoint at least three (3) other members to serve on the team, including a school resource officer.  The SAFE Team shall: (a)  Create and annually update the school elopement plan and respond to all elopements. (b)  Provide training to all school personnel to familiarize such personnel with the school elopement plan and all necessary procedures. (4)  (a)  If a student with disabilities is prone to elopement, the SAFE Team, in coordination with the student's parent, must create a student-specific elopement quick reference guide.  The elopement quick reference guide must include all of the following: (i)  The student's identifying information; (ii)  A current photograph of the student; (iii)  The student's level of communication; (iv)  A list of the student's interests, behaviors, preferences and aversions; (v)  Any health considerations for the student; (vi)  A list of any GPS technology that could be used to help locate the student; and (vii)  A list of possible locations where the student may go when eloping. (b)  The SAFE Team must distribute a student's elopement quick reference guide to the student's parent and all relevant school personnel. (5)  Each public school must annually provide its elopement plan to the local school board. (6)  The state board may adopt rules to administer this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.